Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 3 Registration of Vehicles
31-3-36.
Replacement of lost or mutilated registration card or plates.

In the event any registration card or plate is lost, mutilated, or becomes illegible, the owner, legal representative, or successor in interest of the owner of the vehicle for which the registration card or plate was issued as shown by the records of the division of motor vehicles shall immediately apply for and may obtain a duplicate, substitute, or a new registration under a new registration number, as determined to be most advisable by the division of motor vehicles, upon the applicant furnishing information satisfactory to the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-36

.

31-3-37.
Assignment of new identifying numbers.

The division of motor vehicles is authorized to assign a distinguishing number to a motor vehicle whenever the motor or serial number thereon is destroyed or obliterated and to issue to the owner a special plate bearing such distinguishing number which shall be affixed to the vehicle in a position to be determined by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. The motor vehicle shall be registered under this distinguishing number in lieu of the former serial number.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-37

.

31-3-38.
Change of engines.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized to adopt and enforce such registration rules and regulations that are deemed necessary and compatible with the public interest with respect to the change or substitution of one engine in place of another in any motor vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-38

.

31-3-39.
Amateur radio operator plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue for any motor vehicle eligible for registration as an automobile or eligible for registration as a commercial vehicle and having a gross weight of nine thousand (9,000) pounds or less for the motor vehicle of a radio amateur, other than a novice, licensed by the federal communications commission, as long as he or she shall remain so licensed, and such registration plates as issued shall identify the registrant by the station and operator “call sign” assigned to him or her by the federal communications commission. This issuance of special plates shall be in accordance with the statutory requirements relating to the registration of motor vehicles and upon the payment of the regular registration fee. Application for the special plates shall be made in advance and upon the special form or forms as the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall designate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 485, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 241, § 1.

31-3-40.
Special use identification tags.

A new car dealer or used car dealer may apply to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles for special use identification tags for use on vehicles sold by him or her pending the registration of the vehicles, and provided that all vehicles upon which special use identification tags are to be used conform to the standards for general safety. Special use identification tags shall be of a size and type determined by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, and shall be sold to dealers at a cost to be determined by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per plate.

Special use certificates and special use identification tags may be used on a vehicle sold by the dealer to a resident or nonresident. The special use certificate and special use identification tags shall be valid for no more than twenty (20) days including the date of delivery of the certificate and tags by the dealer, and no dealer or any other person shall extend the expiration date thereof, nor shall any person other than the administrator of the division of motor vehicles issue another similar certificate or tag. The special certificate shall be carried in the vehicle bearing the special use identification tags whenever the vehicle is being operated on a public highway. Special use identification tags shall be displayed in the same manner as required in this chapter for the display of registration plates. Upon the removal of special use identification tags from a vehicle, they shall be destroyed immediately by the person to whom issued or his or her agent.

Upon the issuance of a special use certificate and special use identification tags, the dealer shall prepare the special use certificate in triplicate and shall print or type all of the information required on the certificate. The dealer shall imprint legibly with a rubber date stamp, in black ink, upon the special use identification tag, the date of expiration of the tag in letters and numerals not less than one inch (1") in height, nor less than one-fourth of an inch (1/4") in width. The special use identification tag shall also contain the vehicle identification number of the car on which it is displayed and the dealer’s identification number. The original copy of the special use certificate shall be given to the person named in the certificate. The duplicate copy shall become the notice required by subsection (d) of this section. The third copy shall be held in the dealer’s files and shall be exhibited upon demand of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles or of any peace officer.

Notice of delivery of the special use certificate and special use identification tags shall be mailed to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles not later than the next business day after delivery.

In the event that a dealer goes out of business, or transfers his or her business to any other person, firm, or corporation, the dealer shall return to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles within five (5) days all special use certificates and special use identification tags held by him or her.

No dealer shall make any use of special use certificates or special use identification tags except in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 360, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 29, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 296, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 103; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 13, § 1.

31-3-41.
Return of registration card and plates — Receipt.

Whenever, under any of the provisions of title 31, entitled “motor and other vehicles,” a person surrenders, returns, or delivers to any person in the division of motor vehicles, any registration card or plate, a receipt shall be given, sufficiently identifying the registration card or plate and showing the date it was received. As soon as practical after January 1st, in every year, the division of motor vehicles shall furnish, without charge, to the tax assessors of each city or town in this state a statement of cancellation, surrendering or returns of registration plates of motor vehicles whose owners have addresses in the respective cities or towns on or after January 1st and through the thirty-first (31st) day of December of the previous year and the inclusive dates of their registration with this period.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 451, § 1.

31-3-42.
Camper plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue plates designated as “camper plates” to any person who shall register a travel trailer, pick-up coach, pick-up camper, motorized camper, or tent trailer. In addition, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue a registration certificate to any person registering a pick-up coach or pick-up camper, which shall be affixed to the coach or camper portion of the vehicle and for which there shall be an additional registration fee of three dollars ($3.00). The design of the certificate shall be prescribed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles and the certificate shall be maintained in a manner and location prescribed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 217, § 3; P.L. 1977, ch. 218, § 1.

31-3-43.
Sheriffs’ department plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue to the sheriffs’ departments of the various counties, for use on state owned vehicles used by the departments, a special identifying number plate in numerical sequence preceded by the words “sheriff’s department.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 62, § 1.

31-3-44.
Ambulance or rescue vehicles.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue passenger car registration plates for any ambulance or rescue vehicle, used in transporting sick or injured patients, owned by a city or town or as part of a volunteer ambulance or rescue corps.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 218, § 1.

31-3-45.
Police motorcycle plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue to all police departments police motorcycle registration plates. These plates shall be imprinted with the words “police motorcycle” and shall be a distinctive color to distinguish them from standard motorcycle plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 233, § 1.

31-3-45.1.
Police registration plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall upon request issue to all police departments within this state, as listed in §

12-7-21

but, excluding the Rhode Island state police, and Rhode Island sheriffs’ department, police registration plates.

The above described plates shall be imprinted with the word “police” and shall be of a distinctive color to distinguish them from standard registration plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 433, § 1.

31-3-46.
P.O.W. plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue plates designated as “Ex-P.O.W.” upon application on proper forms furnished by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles to former prisoners of war (P.O.W.) of World Wars I and II, the Korean conflict, and Vietnam conflict. The plates may be issued for any motor vehicle eligible for registration as an automobile, or a commercial vehicle having a gross weight of ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs) or less. The applicant shall not be required to pay a registration fee or service charge for the plate. Upon the death of the holder of any P.O.W. plates, the plates shall be transferred to his or her surviving spouse for the spouse’s lifetime until he or she remarries.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 253, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 588, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 34, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 30, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 220, § 1.

31-3-47.
Judiciary plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available to each justice of the supreme, superior, family, and district courts, to each judge of the workers’ compensation court, the general magistrate of the family court, and to each judge or magistrate of the traffic tribunal of the state of Rhode Island, so long as that member is serving, a special motor vehicle registration plate.

Each special motor vehicle registration plate shall carry thereon the design and the seal of the state of Rhode Island and the word, “judiciary.”

The special motor vehicle registration plate shall have consecutive numbers starting with one through the combined number of people entitled to said plates. Numbers one through five (5) shall be assigned to the supreme court; numbers six (6) through eight (8) shall be assigned to the presiding justice of superior court, chief judge of family court, and chief judge of district court, number nine (9) shall be assigned to the chief judge of the workers’ compensation court; number ten (10) shall be assigned to the chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal. Each remaining member of the judiciary, and the remaining members of the workers’ compensation court, and the remaining judges and magistrates of the traffic tribunal and the general magistrate of the family court will then be awarded a number according to seniority. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall reassign numbers no more than every four (4) years after the initial distribution.

Each member of the judiciary, workers’ compensation court, the general magistrate of the family court and traffic tribunal, as provided in this section, shall have the option of displaying at any time that plate or the private registration plate assigned to his or her vehicle.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue the judiciary plate upon payment, in addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, of a service charge of ten dollars ($10.00) for each issue and for each registration renewal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 52, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 1, § 9; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 14, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 14, effective June 23, 2021.

31-3-48.
Plates for recipients of Purple Heart.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available to recipients of the Purple Heart Medal up to two (2) sets of special motor vehicle registration plates indicating the owner as a recipient of the Purple Heart.

The plate shall contain the words “combat wounded” across the top of the plate and shall have an insignia for the Purple Heart and be followed by the letters “P H”, followed by a numeral or numerals. The Purple Heart insignia may be reproduced on the plate in the color purple.

Upon the death of the holder of any Purple Heart plates, the plates shall be transferred to his or her surviving spouse for the spouse’s lifetime until he or she remarries.

The applicant is not required to pay a registration fee or service charge for the plates.

Upon the death of the holder of any Purple Heart plates, if there is no surviving spouse, a family member of the recipient may retain one of the special motor vehicle registration plates in his or her own keeping, provided he or she does not display the plate upon any motor vehicle or any other form of transportation owned or operated by the family member. The other Purple Heart plate must be returned to the division of motor vehicles.

Any violation of the provisions of subsection (e) of this section shall be deemed a civil violation, and any person displaying a special motor vehicle registration plate upon any vehicle shall, upon conviction, be fined five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense. Each day in which the special motor vehicle registration plate is displayed upon any vehicle shall be a separate offense punishable by the same penalty.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 53, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 345, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 482, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 56; P.L. 2002, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 334, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 335, § 1, effective June 29, 2022.

31-3-48.1.
Plates for recipients of Distinguished Service Cross.

The administrator of motor vehicles is empowered to make available to recipients of the United States Army Distinguished Service Cross medal a special motor vehicle registration plate indicating the owner as a recipient of the distinguished service cross. The applicant shall be required to pay a registration fee and a transfer charge of five dollars ($5.00) for the plate.

The plate shall contain the words “Distinguished Service Cross” across the top of the plate, shall bear an insignia for the distinguished service cross, and then a numeral or numerals.

Upon the death of the holder of any “Distinguished Service Cross” plate, the plate shall be transferred to the surviving spouse for the spouse’s lifetime or until remarriage.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 246, § 1.

31-3-48.2.
Plates for recipients of the Bronze Star Medal.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available to recipients of the United States Bronze Star Medal a special motor vehicle registration plate indicating the owner as a recipient of the Bronze Star Medal. The applicant shall be required to pay a registration fee and a transfer charge of five dollars ($5.00) for the plate.

The plate shall contain the words “Bronze Star Medal” across the top of the plate, shall bear an insignia for the Bronze Star Medal, and then a numeral or numerals.

Upon the death of the holder of any “Bronze Star Medal” plate, the plate shall be transferred to the surviving spouse for the spouse’s lifetime or until remarriage.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 71, § 1, effective June 15, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 72, § 1, effective June 15, 2022.

31-3-49.
Chief Judge Emeritus — Charles F. Trumpetto.

The division of motor vehicles of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of former district court judge, Charles F. Trumpetto. This plate is to bear the identification “Chief Judge Emeritus” with a seal of the state imprinted on it and shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as Judge Trumpetto so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 611, § 1.

31-3-50.
Chief Judge Emeritus 8 — William R. Goldberg.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of former family court chief judge, William R. Goldberg. This plate is to bear the identification “Chief Judge Emeritus 8” with a seal of the state thereon imprinted and shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as Judge Goldberg so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 481, § 1.

31-3-51.
Police Chief Emeritus — Matthew Lynch.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of former police chief of the city of Woonsocket, Matthew Lynch. This plate is to bear the identification “Police Chief Emeritus” and shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as Matthew Lynch so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 611, § 1.

31-3-52.
Certificate of prior use.

Upon the sale or transfer of title by a dealer of any used motor vehicle, the dealer shall execute and deliver to the buyer an instrument in writing in a form prescribed by the Rhode Island automobile dealers licensing commission which shall set forth the nature of the principal prior use of the vehicle when dealers know or have reason to know that the use of vehicle was a taxicab, police vehicle, driver education vehicle, rental vehicle, or vehicle which has been repurchased pursuant to chapter 5.2 or chapter 5.4 of this title, a similar statute of another state, or an arbitration or alternative dispute procedure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 225, § 1.

31-3-53.
Veterans’ plates.

The registrar of motor vehicles shall issue for any motor vehicle eligible for registration as an automobile, or for any motorcycle eligible for registration as a motorcycle, or for a commercial vehicle having a gross weight of twelve thousand pounds (12,000 lbs.) or less, plates designated as “Veteran” upon application on proper forms furnished by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles to veterans.

The special plate designated “Veteran” shall be designed as follows:

Letters and numbers shall be blue in a white background with the words “Rhode Island” clearly visible at the top center of the plate and the word “Veteran” visible at the bottom center of the plate.

The background will be a red, white, and blue waving American Flag.

On the top right corner will be a decal with the military branch of the service in which the Veteran served (Army, Navy, Air Force, Marines, Coast Guard, and Merchant Marines).

For war veterans, a white decal with blue letters with the words “War Veteran” placed under the military branch decal on the right side of the plate above the validation sticker.

The applicant shall not be required to pay a service charge or a transfer charge for each plate.

The applicant shall be entitled to a plate for each vehicle owned by the applicant.

The applicant shall also be entitled to a plate for one vehicle owned by an entity the applicant owns. The entity must be registered and authorized to conduct business in the state of Rhode Island. The applicant must provide to the division of motor vehicles documentation demonstrating the applicant’s ownership of the entity.

The owner of a motor vehicle eligible for registration as a commercial vehicle and having a gross weight of twelve thousand pounds (12,000 lbs.) or less who is issued veteran plates shall continue to pay the appropriate commercial registration fee for those plates.

For the purposes of this section, a “veteran” shall be defined as any person who has served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States. The term “veteran” shall also include members of the National Guard and Reserves: (i) Called to active duty authorized by the President of the United States or the Secretary of Defense; or (ii) Who have twenty (20) years of service with a letter and record of separation of service.

For the purposes of this section, “War Veteran” shall be defined as any veteran of any conflict or undeclared war who has earned a campaign ribbon or expeditionary medal for service in either a declared or undeclared war as noted on the war veteran’s DD-214. Upon the death of the holder of any veteran plates, the plates shall be transferred to the surviving spouse for the spouse’s lifetime until he or she remarries.

The “veteran” or “war veteran” described in subdivisions (f)(1)(i) or (ii) and (f)(2) must have been honorably discharged from the armed forces of this nation in order to receive plates pursuant to this section and, for purposes of this section, a medical discharge or a general discharge shall be deemed an honorable discharge.

[Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 119, § 1 and P.L. 2021, ch. 120, § 1.]

A person shall be eligible for a veterans’ plate if his or her deceased spouse was eligible for a veterans’ plate, notwithstanding the fact that the eligible, deceased spouse died prior to the enactment of this section in 1988.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 458, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 402, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 426, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 454, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 30, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 156, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 411, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 305, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 323, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 460, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 428, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 642, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 10, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 11, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 510, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 9, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 119, § 1, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 120, § 1, effective July 2, 2021.

31-3-54.
Police Chief Emeritus — John C. Beebe III.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the motor vehicle of former police chief of the city of Newport, John C. Beebe III. This plate is to bear the identification “Police Chief Emeritus” along with an appropriate number and shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as John C. Beebe III so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 591, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 300, § 1.

31-3-55.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 418, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 36 § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 39, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 57, effective July 7, 2000.

31-3-56.
Congressman Emeritus — Fernand J. St. Germain.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of former United States representative, first district, Fernand J. St. Germain. This plate is to bear the identification “Congressman Emeritus”, along with an appropriate number and the plate shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as Fernand J. St. Germain so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 558, § 1.

31-3-57.
Police Chief Emeritus — John T. Botelho.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of former police chief of the town of East Greenwich, John T. Botelho. This plate is to bear the identification “Police Chief Emeritus”, along with an appropriate number and the plate shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as John T. Botelho so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 41, § 1.

31-3-58.
Judge Emeritus — Edward J. Plunkett.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of former district court judge, Edward J. Plunkett. This plate is to bear the identification “Judge Emeritus” with an appropriate number and a seal of the state thereon imprinted and the plate shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as Judge Plunkett so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 276, § 1.

31-3-59.
House Emeritus — Irving Levin.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of former representative Irving Levin. This plate is to bear the identification “Representative Emeritus” along with an appropriate number and the plate shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as Irving Levin so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 41, § 1.

31-3-59.1.
Congressman Emeritus — Edward Beard.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of former United States Representative, Second District, Edward Beard. This plate is to bear the identification “Congressman Emeritus” along with an appropriate number and the plate shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as Edward Beard so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 111, § 1.

31-3-60.
Alternative design plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered and authorized to make available to every owner of a motor vehicle eligible for registration as an automobile or commercial vehicle plates designated as “alternative design” upon application on proper forms furnished by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. The alternative plates shall display upon them the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle for the period the registration remains active. Upon issuance of said alternative plates, the original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles for destruction.

The alternative plates shall be designed as follows:

White reflective background;

Top border shall be red stripes except the words “Rhode Island” which shall be solid red;

Letters and numbers shall be blue;

Bottom border shall be blue stripes with thirteen (13) white stars;

On the bottom above the border the words “Ocean State” in blue except commercial plates which shall have the word “Commercial” in place of the words “Ocean State”;

Background shall contain the picture of a sailboat and water in grey.

The applicant shall be required to pay a service charge of twenty dollars ($20.00) for the plate.

The owner of a motor vehicle eligible for registration as an automobile that is issued alternative plates shall continue to pay the appropriate automobile registration fee for the plates. The owner of a motor vehicle eligible for registration as a commercial vehicle that is issued alternative plates shall continue to pay the appropriate commercial registration fee for the plates pursuant to §

31-3-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 114, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 85, § 5.

31-3-61.
Fire Chief Emeritus — Gerald Landry.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of former fire chief of the city of Woonsocket, Gerald Landry. This plate is to bear the identification “Fire Chief Emeritus” along with an appropriate number and the plate shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as Gerald Landry so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 142, § 1.

31-3-62.
National guard plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered and authorized to make available to all active and retired members of the Rhode Island army and air national guard a special motor vehicle registration plate for any motor vehicle eligible for registration as an automobile or a commercial vehicle having a gross weight of eight thousand-five hundred pounds (8,500 lbs.) or less.

The special motor vehicle registration plate shall carry on it the designation “National Guard” and shall also carry on it an emblem on the left-hand side of the plate to be designed and provided by the office of the adjutant general, with the numerals to the right of it.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue the plate upon the payment of a service charge of twenty dollars ($20.00) and a transfer charge of five dollars ($5.00) for the plate. All revenues shall be deposited as general revenues.

For the purposes of this section an active or retired member of the Rhode Island army and air national guard shall be defined as any person certified by the adjutant general as currently serving or having retired under honorable conditions in either the Rhode Island army or air national guard.

In a state of emergency, any active member of the army or air national guard driving a vehicle bearing the special motor vehicle registration plate shall be authorized and empowered to travel upon the highways of the state notwithstanding any driving ban imposed by any state or municipal authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 101; P.L. 2003, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 144, § 1.

31-3-63.
High Sheriff Emeritus — Anthony A. Giorgio.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of the former high sheriff of Kent County, Anthony A. Giorgio. This plate is to bear the identification “High Sheriff Emeritus” along with an appropriate number and the plate shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as Anthony A. Giorgio so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 193, § 1.

31-3-64.
Combination plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue:

For any motor vehicle eligible for registration as a commercial vehicle having a gross weight of eight thousand eight hundred pounds (8,800 lbs.) or less, plates designated as “combination” upon application and proper form furnished by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles to applicants. The combination plates will allow those vehicles to drive for both commercial and pleasure purposes; or

For any motor vehicle eligible for registration as a commercial vehicle having a gross weight over eight thousand eight hundred pounds (8,800 lbs.) up to eleven thousand eight hundred pounds (11,800 lbs.) plates designated as “combination” upon application, proof of ownership of a camping trailer, fifth-wheel camper trailer, travel trailer, or truck camper as defined in §

31-1-3

, and proper form furnished by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles to applicants. The combination plates will allow those vehicles to drive for pleasure purposes only.

The fees for commercial vehicles registering for a combination plate shall be identical to those established for other commercial vehicles of the same weight. A combination registration transaction shall be considered a change to a new registration classification and not a plate change transaction. A combination registration shall be renewable during the month of March each year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 108, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 581, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 448, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 464, § 1.

31-3-65.
Judge Emeritus — Paul DelNero.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of former district court judge, Paul DelNero. This plate is to bear the identification “Judge Emeritus” with an appropriate number and a seal of the state thereon imprinted and the plate shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as Judge DelNero so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 290, § 1.

31-3-66.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 320, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 57, effective July 7, 2000.

31-3-67.
Judge Emeritus — Carmine R. DiPetrillo.

The administrator of the division of the motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of former family court judge Carmine R. DiPetrillo. This plate is to bear the identification “Judge Emeritus” with an appropriate number and a seal of the state thereon imprinted and the plate shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as Judge DiPetrillo so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 240, § 1.

31-3-68.
Police Chief Emeritus — Vincent A. Acciardo.

The administrator of the division of the motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of former police chief Vincent A. Acciardo of the town of Johnston. The plate shall bear the identification “Police Chief Emeritus” with an appropriate number and seal of the state imprinted on the plate and the plate shall be furnished without additional registration charge for any period of time that former Chief Acciardo desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 292, § 1.

31-3-69.
Registration suspension based on federal determination.

The division of motor vehicles is authorized to suspend the registration of a commercial motor vehicle if the commercial motor vehicle is being operated by a commercial motor carrier that has been prohibited from operating in interstate commerce by a federal agency with authority to do so under federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 276, § 2.

31-3-70.
Police Lieutenant Emeritus — John J. Sinotte.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of Jeanna Sinotte, the widow of deceased Police Lieutenant John J. Sinotte of the town of Johnston. The plate is to bear the identification “Police Lt. Emeritus” with the designation number “20” and the seal of the state imprinted on it. The plate shall be furnished without additional registration charge for as long as Jeanna Sinotte desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 345, § 1.

31-3-71.
Chief Justice Emeritus — Joseph R. Weisberger.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of former State Supreme Court Chief Justice Joseph R. Weisberger. The plate to bear the designation “Chief Justice Emeritus”, with an appropriate designation number and the seal of the state imprinted on it. The plate shall be furnished without additional registration charge for as long as Chief Justice Weisberger desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 401, § 1.

31-3-72.
Special plate for Mr. Potato Head.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available a special motor vehicle registration plate commemorating the fiftieth (50th) anniversary of Mr. Potato Head. The plate shall bear the designation “Mr. Potato Head — 50th anniversary” and shall bear the seal of the state imprinted on it. The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the original registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and the registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

A special automobile or commercial commemorative Mr. Potato Head — 50th anniversary plate shall be issued upon application using forms furnished by the administrator upon payment in addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, and a service charge of forty dollars ($40.00) for each issue. The service charge shall be paid to the administrator prior to the administrator’s acceptance of the application. Twenty dollars ($20.00) of the service charge shall be paid to the Rhode Island Community Food Bank and twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the division of motor vehicles for its costs in manufacturing and distributing the special plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 138, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 382, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 178, § 1.

31-3-73.
Police Major Emeritus, City of East Providence.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of Brooke McGregor, the widow of deceased Police Major Alister McGregor of the city of East Providence Police Department. The plate is to bear the identification “Police Major Emeritus” with the designation number to be chosen by the widow and the seal of the state imprinted on it. The plate shall be furnished without additional registration charge for as long as Brooke McGregor desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 252, § 1.

31-3-74.
Police chief emeritus.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the motor vehicle of the former police chief of the town of Coventry, Roger J. Laliberte. This plate is to bear the identification “Police Chief Emeritus,” along with an appropriate designation number imprinted on it and shall be furnished without additional registration charge for long as Roger J. Laliberte so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 243, § 1.